Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 11.1 Purchase and Sale of Precious Metals

6-11.1-1.
License required — “Person” defined.

No person, including a pawnbroker, consignment shop, or salvage yard operator or second-hand dealer, as defined in §

5-21-1

, shall engage in the business of buying or receiving for the purpose of selling: gold, silver, platinum group metals, or precious stones, or any articles containing those items, including catalytic converters, other than coins purchased for their numismatic value rather than their metal content, referred to in this chapter as “precious metals”, from the general public for the purpose of reselling the precious metals in any condition without first obtaining a license from the attorney general of the state of Rhode Island, also called “the attorney general” in this chapter. The attorney general shall not issue any license to a person who has not registered a permanent place of business within the state for the purchase or sale of precious metals. The criteria for determining a person’s permanent place of business shall be formulated by the attorney general immediately on or after July 1, 1981.

The word “person,” when used in this chapter, shall include individuals, partnerships, associations, and corporations.

This chapter shall not apply to any financial institution that is covered by federal or state deposit insurance, nor to jewelry and silverware manufacturers purchasing precious metals directly from trade suppliers.

The word “catalytic converter” when used in this chapter shall be defined as an air pollution abatement device that removes pollutants from motor vehicle exhaust, either by oxidizing them into carbon dioxide and water or reducing them to nitrogen.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-2.
Application for license — Annual fee — Attorney general to promulgate rules and regulations.

Application for the license shall be in writing, under oath, and in the form prescribed by the attorney general and shall contain the name and the address (both of the residence and place of business) of the applicant, and if the applicant is a partnership or association, of every member, and if a corporation, of each officer and director and of the principal owner or owners of the issued and outstanding capital stock; also the city or town with the street and number where the business is to be conducted and any further information that the attorney general may require.

After receipt of an application for a license, the attorney general shall conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts presented in the application are true. The attorney general may also request a record search and a report from the National Crime and Information Center (NCIC) of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. If the application discloses that the applicant has a disqualifying criminal record, or if the investigation indicates that any of the facts presented in the application are not true; or if the records of the department of the attorney general indicate criminal activity on the part of the person signing the application and any other persons named in the application; or if the NCIC report indicates an outstanding warrant for the person signing the application and any other persons named in the application; then the attorney general may initiate a nationwide criminal records check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation regarding the person signing the application and any other persons named in the application. Upon the annual renewal of a license or the opening of a new branch designated in the license, the attorney general may initiate a nationwide criminal records check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation regarding the licensee and any other persons named in the license. The individual who is subject to the national records check shall be responsible for the cost of conducting such check.

The applicant at the time of making his or her initial application only shall pay to the attorney general the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) as a fee for investigating the application and the additional sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be paid annually. The licensee shall pay an additional fifty dollars ($50.00) annually for each branch designated in the license. Licenses shall not be assignable or transferable to any other person or entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 502, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-3.
Identification and authority of seller — Posting of prices — Weighing.

Every person required to be licensed under this chapter shall require positive proof of identification with photograph, date of birth, and current address of every seller from whom precious metals or an article made from or containing a precious metal is to be purchased and shall require the seller to sign a statement on a form to be approved by the attorney general stating that the seller is the legal owner of the property or is the agent of the owner authorized to sell the property and when and where or in what manner the property was obtained.

Every person required to be licensed under this chapter shall, before purchasing any precious metal or article made from or containing a precious metal, shall require the seller, if a minor, to be accompanied by the parent or legal guardian of the minor.

Every person required to be licensed under this chapter shall post the prices per ounce that are currently being paid for precious metals in full sight of the prospective seller and the precious metals shall be weighed in full sight of the prospective seller.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-4.
Record of transactions required — Reports to police.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, every person licensed under this chapter shall keep a copy of the report form obtained from or under the direction of the attorney general, containing a comprehensive record of all transactions concerning precious metals including catalytic converters. The comprehensive record shall be hand printed legibly or typed. The record shall include the date and hour of the transaction; the name, address, telephone number and date of birth of the seller, as well as a photocopy or digital image of a seller’s photo identification; the seller’s signature; and a complete and accurate description of the property purchased or sold including any serial numbers or other identifying marks or symbols.

For any transacted catalytic converter, the record shall include either the vehicle registration or the vehicle identification number for the vehicle from which it was removed and the license plate number, state of issue, make, and model of the vehicle used to deliver the property to the licensee.

All persons licensed under this chapter shall deliver or mail weekly to the chief of police of the city or town in which the business is located and electronically submit to the attorney general, in a manner specified by the attorney general, all report forms from the preceding seven-day (7) period.

Every person licensed under this chapter shall retain a copy of the report form for a period of one year from the date of the sale stated on the form. These records are to be made available for inspection by any law enforcement agency requesting to review them. Licensees or secondary metals recyclers are prohibited from releasing a supplier’s information without their consent, unless the disclosure is made in response to a request from a law enforcement agency.

The requirements set forth in subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to business-to-business transactions. For purposes of this section, “business-to-business transactions” means a purchase of precious metals from a person or entity that is in the business of generating precious metals from its normal operation or is duly engaged in the business of purchasing, selling, bartering, or dealing in automotive salvage, precious metals, or secondhand articles.

Any violation of these provisions shall be subject to the penalties set forth in §

6-11.1-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 502, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8; P.L. 2022, ch. 382, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 383, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

6-11.1-5.
Fourteen-day holding period — Recovery of stolen property — Return to rightful owner.

All persons licensed under this chapter shall retain in their possession in an unaltered condition for a period of fourteen (14) days all precious metals or articles made from or containing a precious metal including catalytic converters except items of bullion, including coins, bars, and medallions, that do not contain serial numbers or other identifying marks. The fourteen-day (14) holding period shall commence with the date the report of its acquisition was delivered to or received by the chief of police or the attorney general, whichever is later. The records so received by the chief of police and the attorney general shall be available for inspection only by law enforcement officers for law enforcement purposes. If the chief of police has probable cause that precious metals or an article made from or containing a precious metal has been stolen, he or she may give notice, in writing, to the person licensed, to retain the metal or article for an additional period of fifteen (15) days, and the person shall retain the property for this additional fifteen-day (15) period, unless the notice is recalled, in writing, within the fifteen-day (15) period. Within the fifteen-day (15) period the chief of police, or his or her designee, shall designate, in writing, an officer to secure the property alleged to be stolen and the persons in possession of the property shall deliver the property to the officer upon display of the officer’s written designation by the chief of police or his or her designee. Upon receipt of the property from the officer, the clerk or person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property for a police department shall enter into a book a description of every article of property alleged to be stolen that was brought to the police department and shall attach a number to each article. The clerk or person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property shall deliver the property to the owner of the property upon satisfactory proof of ownership, without any cost to the owner, provided that the following steps are followed:

A complete photographic record of the property is made;

A signed declaration of ownership under penalty of perjury is obtained from the person to whom the property is delivered;

The person from whom the custody of the property was taken is served with written notice of the claim of ownership and is given ten (10) days from the mailing of the notice to file a petition in district court objecting to the delivery of the property to the person claiming ownership. If a petition is filed in a timely manner, the district court shall, at a hearing, determine by a preponderance of the evidence that the property was stolen and that the person claiming ownership of the property is the true owner. The decision of the district court may only be appealable by writ of certiorari to the supreme court.

The clerk or person in charge of the storage of alleged stolen property shall not be liable for damages for any official act performed in good faith in the course of carrying out the provisions of this section. The photographic record of the alleged stolen property shall be allowed to be introduced as evidence in any court of this state in place of the actual alleged stolen property; provided that the clerk in charge of the storage of the alleged stolen property shall take photographs of the property and those photographs shall be tagged and marked and remain in his possession or control.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 502, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-6.
Persons injured by violations of chapter — Damages and costs.

Any person who has been damaged or injured by the failure of a person required to be licensed under this chapter to comply with the provisions of this chapter may recover the actual damages sustained. The court, in its discretion may also award punitive damages and/or the costs of suit and reasonable attorneys’ fees to a prevailing plaintiff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-7.
Penalties.

Every person who shall violate the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

If the value of the property involved in a transaction that is in violation of this chapter exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), a person convicted of a violation shall be fined not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned for not more than three (3) years or both.

The attorney general shall have the authority to suspend the license of any person required to be licensed under this chapter as a result of violations of this chapter or attorney general regulations leading to penalties under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-8.
Rules and regulations.

The attorney general is authorized to promulgate, adopt, and enforce any and all rules and regulations deemed necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities of this chapter. Rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 475, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1.

6-11.1-9.
Refusal to issue license.

The attorney general shall refuse to issue a license when the attorney general has found that the application for the license contains a false representation of a material fact; when investigation reveals that the person applying for the license has previously been guilty of a violation of this chapter or has been a partner of a partnership, member of an association, or an officer or director of a corporation that has previously been guilty of a violation of this chapter; or has a disqualifying criminal record as defined in §

6-11.1-13

. The attorney general may, in his or her discretion, issue a license if the disqualifying criminal record is more than ten (10) years old.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-10.
Suspension, revocation, and nonrenewal of license.

The attorney general, upon his or her own motion or upon receipt of a signed, written complaint alleging violations of this chapter or of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, may, after a hearing, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any license issued pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-11.
Hearings.

Hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 2.

6-11.1-12.
Appeals.

Appeals from a decision by the attorney general shall be made to the sixth division district court in Providence. Appeals from the decision of the sixth division district court shall be to the supreme court in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1.

6-11.1-13.
Disqualifying criminal records — Employees or agents of licensee.

A licensee convicted in a court of this state, a court of another state, or in a federal court, of a felony charge of forgery; embezzlement; obtaining money under false pretenses; bribery; larceny; extortion; conspiracy to defraud; receiving stolen goods; burglary; breaking and entering; or any similar offense or offenses; or tax evasion associated with the conduct of business under a license issued pursuant to this chapter; shall forfeit his or her license. Prior to forfeiture of the license, the licensee may request a hearing on the forfeiture. The attorney general, when so requested, shall hold a hearing. No licensee shall employ or engage any person as an employee or agent while engaging in the business of trading in precious metals who has been convicted of any of the offenses as they are described in this section and which shall be deemed to be a disqualifying criminal record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 8.

6-11.1-14.
Severability.

If any provision or phrase of this chapter or application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or phrases or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or phrase or application, and to this end the provisions and phrases of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 294, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-11.1-8

; as redesignated by P.L. 1985, ch. 474, § 1.